Washington statutes.
RCW 32.04.012

Limits on loans and extensions of credit.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this title, a savings bank is subject to the same limits on loans and extensions of credit, and exceptions thereto, as set forth in *RCW 30.04.111.

[ 2013 c 76 s 23.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 30.04.111 was recodified as RCW 30A.04.111 pursuant to 2014 c 37 s 4, effective January 5, 2015.